Hawaii statutes.
[§269-172] Electric utilities; cost
recovery; billing agent. (a) The public utilities commission shall ensure
that all reasonable costs incurred by electric utilities to start up and
implement the loan program may be recovered as part of the electric utility's
revenue requirement, including necessary billing system adjustments, costs
arising out of the billing and collection of green infrastructure charges, and
any costs for green infrastructure charges that are not recovered via
participating customers' green infrastructure bill payments, or otherwise.

(b) The green infrastructure charge shall not
be considered revenue of the electric utilities and accordingly, shall not be
subject to state or county taxes, including the general excise tax under chapter
237, the public service company tax under chapter 239, the public utility fee
under section 269‑30, and the public utility franchise tax under chapter
240.

(c) The loan program or the act of serving as
an agent to bill and to collect the green infrastructure charge shall not cause
any electric utility to be subject to the laws that regulate financial
institutions, escrow depositories, or collection agencies. An electric utility
shall not be responsible for lending, underwriting, and credit determinations.
[L 2013, c 211, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next